Illinois, session 104th, SB1583.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Sections 53-14.9 and 21B-30 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/3-14.9)  (from Ch. 122, par. 3-14.9)7    Sec. 3-14.9. Elevation of standard of teaching - 8Improvement of schools. To labor in every practicable way to 9elevate the standard of teaching and improve the condition of 10the common schools of his county. The State Superintendent of 11Education may designate a regional office of education or 12intermediate service center as a learning partner in any 13iteration of the statewide system of support so that services 14are provided to schools that are identified for school 15improvement under (i) the accountability system identified in 16Section 2-3.25a of this Code and (ii) the definition for 17Targeted, Comprehensive, or Intensive under Section 2-3.25d-5 18of this Code. The status of learning partner as designated 19under this Section may be revoked at the State 20Superintendent's sole discretion. 21(Source: Laws 1961, p. 31.) 22    (105 ILCS 5/21B-30)  SB1583 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 11977 LNS 22071 b1    Sec. 21B-30. Educator testing.2    (a) (Blank).3    (b) The State Board of Education, in consultation with the 4State Educator Preparation and Licensure Board, shall design 5and implement a system of examinations, which shall be 6required prior to the issuance of educator licenses. These 7examinations and indicators must be based on national and 8State professional teaching standards, as determined by the 9State Board of Education, in consultation with the State 10Educator Preparation and Licensure Board. The State Board of 11Education may adopt such rules as may be necessary to 12implement and administer this Section.13    (c) (Blank).14    (c-5) The State Board must adopt rules to implement a 15paraprofessional competency test. This test would allow an 16applicant seeking an Educator License with Stipulations with a 17paraprofessional educator endorsement to obtain the 18endorsement if he or she passes the test and meets the other 19requirements of subparagraph (J) of paragraph (2) of Section 2021B-20 other than the higher education requirements. 21    (d) All applicants seeking a State license shall be 22required to pass a test of content area knowledge for each area 23of endorsement for which there is an applicable test. There 24shall be no exception to this requirement. However, 25notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, individuals 26seeking a short-term approval for school support personnel, as   SB1583 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 11977 LNS 22071 b1defined in rules, are not required to take the test of content 2area knowledge prior to the short-term approval being issued. 3    (d-5) The State Board shall consult with any applicable 4vendors within 90 days after July 28, 2023 (the effective date 5of Public Act 103-402) to develop a plan to transition the test 6of content area knowledge in the endorsement area of 7elementary education, grades one through 6, by July 1, 2026 to 8a content area test that contains testing elements that cover 9bilingualism, biliteracy, oral language development, 10foundational literacy skills, and developmentally appropriate 11higher-order comprehension and on which a valid and reliable 12language and literacy subscore can be determined. The State 13Board shall base its rules concerning the passing subscore on 14the language and literacy portion of the test on the 15recommended cut-score determined in the formal 16standard-setting process. Candidates need not achieve a 17particular subscore in the area of language and literacy. The 18State Board shall aggregate and publish the number of 19candidates in each preparation program who take the test and 20the number who pass the language and literacy portion.21    (e) (Blank).22    (f) Beginning on August 4, 2023 (the effective date of 23Public Act 103-488) through August 31, 2025, no candidate 24completing a teacher preparation program in this State or 25candidate subject to Section 21B-35 of this Code is required 26to pass a teacher performance assessment. Except as otherwise   SB1583 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 11977 LNS 22071 b1provided in this Article, beginning on September 1, 2015 until 2August 4, 2023 (the effective date of Public Act 103-488) and 3beginning again on September 1, 2025, all candidates 4completing teacher preparation programs in this State and all 5candidates subject to Section 21B-35 of this Code are required 6to pass a teacher performance assessment approved by the State 7Board of Education, in consultation with the State Educator 8Preparation and Licensure Board. A candidate may not be 9required to submit test materials by video submission. Subject 10to appropriation, an individual who holds a Professional 11Educator License and is employed for a minimum of one school 12year by a school district designated as Tier 1 under Section 1318-8.15 may, after application to the State Board, receive 14from the State Board a refund for any costs associated with 15completing the teacher performance assessment under this 16subsection. 17    (f-5) The Teacher Performance Assessment Task Force is 18created to evaluate potential performance-based and objective 19teacher performance assessment systems for implementation 20across all educator preparation programs in this State, with 21the intention of ensuring consistency across programs and 22supporting a thoughtful and well-rounded licensure system. 23Members appointed to the Task Force must reflect the racial, 24ethnic, and geographic diversity of this State. The Task Force 25shall consist of all of the following members:26        (1) One member of the Senate, appointed by the   SB1583 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 11977 LNS 22071 b1    President of the Senate.2        (2) One member of the Senate, appointed by the 3    Minority Leader of the Senate.4        (3) One member of the House of Representatives, 5    appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives.6        (4) One member of the House of Representatives, 7    appointed by the Minority Leader of the House of 8    Representatives.9        (5) One member who represents a statewide professional 10    teachers' organization, appointed by the State 11    Superintendent of Education.12        (6) One member who represents a different statewide 13    professional teachers' organization, appointed by the 14    State Superintendent of Education.15        (7) One member from a statewide organization 16    representing school principals, appointed by the State 17    Superintendent of Education.18        (8) One member from a statewide organization 19    representing regional superintendents of schools, 20    appointed by the State Superintendent of Education.21        (9) One member from a statewide organization 22    representing school administrators, appointed by the State 23    Superintendent of Education.24        (10) One member representing a school district 25    organized under Article 34 of this Code, appointed by the 26    State Superintendent of Education.  SB1583 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 11977 LNS 22071 b1        (11) One member of an association representing rural 2    and small schools, appointed by the State Superintendent 3    of Education.4        (12) One member representing a suburban school 5    district, appointed by the State Superintendent of 6    Education.7        (13) One member from a statewide organization 8    representing school districts in the southern suburbs of 9    the City of Chicago, appointed by the State Superintendent 10    of Education.11        (14) One member from a statewide organization 12    representing large unit school districts, appointed by the 13    State Superintendent of Education.14        (15) One member from a statewide organization 15    representing school districts in the collar counties of 16    the City of Chicago, appointed by the State Superintendent 17    of Education.18        (16) Three members, each representing a different 19    public university in this State and each a current member 20    of the faculty of an approved educator preparation 21    program, appointed by the State Superintendent of 22    Education.23        (17) Three members, each representing a different 24    4-year nonpublic university or college in this State and 25    each a current member of the faculty of an approved 26    educator preparation program, appointed by the State   SB1583 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 11977 LNS 22071 b1    Superintendent of Education.2        (18) One member of the Board of Higher Education, 3    appointed by the State Superintendent of Education.4        (19) One member representing a statewide policy 5    organization advocating on behalf of multilingual students 6    and families, appointed by the State Superintendent of 7    Education.8        (20) One member representing a statewide organization 9    focused on research-based education policy to support a 10    school system that prepares all students for college, a 11    career, and democratic citizenship, appointed by the State 12    Superintendent of Education.13        (21) Two members representing an early childhood 14    advocacy organization, appointed by the State 15    Superintendent of Education.16        (22) One member representing a statewide organization 17    that partners with educator preparation programs and 18    school districts to support the growth and development of 19    preservice teachers, appointed by the State Superintendent 20    of Education. 21        (23) One member representing a statewide organization 22    that advocates for educational equity and racial justice 23    in schools, appointed by the State Superintendent of 24    Education.25        (24) One member representing a statewide organization 26    that represents school boards, appointed by the State   SB1583 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 11977 LNS 22071 b1    Superintendent of Education.2        (25) One member who has, within the last 5 years, 3    served as a cooperating teacher, appointed by the State 4    Superintendent of Education. 5    Members of the Task Force shall serve without 6compensation. The Task Force shall first meet at the call of 7the State Superintendent of Education, and each subsequent 8meeting shall be called by the chairperson of the Task Force, 9who shall be designated by the State Superintendent of 10Education. The State Board of Education shall provide 11administrative and other support to the Task Force.12    On or before October 31, 2024, the Task Force shall report 13on its work, including recommendations on a teacher 14performance assessment system in this State, to the State 15Board of Education and the General Assembly. The Task Force is 16dissolved upon submission of this report. 17    (g) The content area knowledge test and the teacher 18performance assessment shall be the tests that from time to 19time are designated by the State Board of Education, in 20consultation with the State Educator Preparation and Licensure 21Board, and may be tests prepared by an educational testing 22organization or tests designed by the State Board of 23Education, in consultation with the State Educator Preparation 24and Licensure Board. The test of content area knowledge shall 25assess content knowledge in a specific subject field. The 26tests must be designed to be racially neutral to ensure that no   SB1583 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 11977 LNS 22071 b1person taking the tests is discriminated against on the basis 2of race, color, national origin, or other factors unrelated to 3the person's ability to perform as a licensed employee. The 4score required to pass the tests shall be fixed by the State 5Board of Education, in consultation with the State Educator 6Preparation and Licensure Board. The State Board of 7Education's rules for scoring the content area knowledge test 8may include scoring and retaking of each test section 9separately and independently. The tests shall be administered 10not fewer than 3 times a year at such time and place as may be 11designated by the State Board of Education, in consultation 12with the State Educator Preparation and Licensure Board. 13    The State Board shall implement a test or tests to assess 14the speaking, reading, writing, and grammar skills of 15applicants for an endorsement or a license issued under 16subdivision (G) of paragraph (2) of Section 21B-20 of this 17Code in the English language and in the language of the 18transitional bilingual education program requested by the 19applicant. 20    (h) Except as provided in Section 34-6 of this Code, the 21provisions of this Section shall apply equally in any school 22district subject to Article 34 of this Code.23    (i) The rules developed to implement and enforce the 24testing requirements under this Section shall include, without 25limitation, provisions governing test selection, test 26validation, and determination of a passing score,   SB1583 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 11977 LNS 22071 b1administration of the tests, frequency of administration, 2applicant fees, frequency of applicants taking the tests, the 3years for which a score is valid, and appropriate special 4accommodations. The State Board of Education shall develop 5such rules as may be needed to ensure uniformity from year to 6year in the level of difficulty for each form of an assessment.7(Source: P.A. 102-301, eff. 8-26-21; 103-402, eff. 7-28-23; 8103-488, eff. 8-4-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-780, eff. 98-2-24; 103-811, eff. 8-9-24; 103-846, eff. 8-9-24.)